Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Chapter 4

Compensation of Witnesses

24-4-101. Basic per diem and mileage.

A witness in a court of record shall receive compensation of one dollar ($1.00) per day for each day's necessary attendance. When a witness resides at a distance greater than ten (10) miles, such witness shall receive four cents (4¢) per mile for going to and returning from court, and tolls and ferriages as allowed by law. Mileage, tolls and ferriages shall be allowed only for one (1) trip going and returning during the term of any court, unless the witness is discharged by the parties, to return, and does return, upon a given day.

Witnesses in courts of record attending under subpoena in a civil matter shall receive upon request to the clerk thirty dollars ($30.00) per day for such attendance. In addition, when such witness resides at a distance of greater than ten (10) miles from the court, the witness shall, upon request to the clerk, also receive reimbursement for travel expenses for each mile traveled when going to and returning from such court at the rate allowable under the state comprehensive travel regulations in effect at that time. All such compensation and reimbursement shall be taxed as cost.

No witness attending any court of record under subpoena in a civil matter shall be entitled to receive the witness compensation and travel expense reimbursement provided for by subsection (b) until such compensation and reimbursement have been taxed and collected as cost by the clerk of the court of record in which such witness has appeared while under subpoena. Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed as preventing the party causing a subpoena to be issued from advancing travel expenses or attendance fees to witnesses.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 22; Shan., § 5617; Code 1932, § 9799; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-401; Acts 1990, ch. 801, § 1; 1991, ch. 354, § 1.

Cross-References. Clerk's fees, §8-21-401.

Criminal cases, §§40-17-112 —40-17-116.

Criminal cases, witnesses summoned from another state, §40-17-208.

Fees of subscribing witnesses to written instruments, §66-23-110.

Garnishee as witness, §§26-2-204,26-2-205.

Impeachment trials, §8-46-201.

Law Reviews.

Claims Against the State in Tennessee — The Court of Claims, 4 Vand. L. Rev. 875.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee law does not provide for the payment of any witness fees or compensation other than what is specified in T.C.A. §§24-4-101 through 107. And that statute provides a per diem for witness attendance, but does not permit a state or local government employee or government employer to charge the party compelling the witness testimony of a government employee any fee—such as a fee representing wages or salary for the time spent attending the trial—over and above the statutory per diem. OAG 17-14, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (2/24/2017).

24-4-102. Witness residing outside county.

All witnesses attending, under summons, any court of record in any county in this state other than the county in which the witness or witnesses live shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for lodging and meals at a rate allowable under the state comprehensive travel regulations in effect at the time such travel expense is incurred. In addition thereto, the witness shall also receive reimbursement at a rate allowable under the state comprehensive travel regulations in effect at the time such travel expense is incurred for each mile traveled in going to and returning from such court.

In addition to the mileage reimbursement allowed, a witness shall be allowed the per diem allowance designated herein for each day required to travel in going to and returning from a trial. Mileage reimbursement to a witness traveling from out of state shall be the same as that allowed a state employee using a personal vehicle for the convenience of the state. In lieu of such mileage reimbursement, a witness traveling from out-of-state may be reimbursed for the cost of travel by common carrier, at a rate not to exceed the regular tourist fare charged the general public.

Acts 1867-1868, ch. 11, § 2; Shan., § 5618; Code 1932, § 9800; Acts 1971, ch. 251, § 1; 1979, ch. 392, §§ 1, 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-402; Acts 1986, ch. 599, § 1; 1997, ch. 119, § 1.

Cross-References. Liability of state or county in criminal cases, §40-25-129.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Claims Against the State in Tennessee — The Court of Claims, 4 Vand. L. Rev. 875.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability to subpoenas issued by indigent criminal defendants, OAG 84-055, 1984 Tenn. AG LEXIS 290 (2/10/84).

Attendance fee for grand jury witness subpoenaed outside county, OAG 88-196, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (11/2/88).

Travel reimbursement for out-of-state witnesses in misdemeanor cases, OAG 99-057, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 197 (3/9/99).

24-4-103. Witness before general sessions judge.

Every witness summoned before a judge of the court of general sessions is entitled to fifty cents (50¢) for each day's attendance; and when summoned to attend in another county from that of the witness' own, shall be entitled to five cents (5¢) per mile for every mile in going to and returning from the county, and all necessary tolls and ferriage.

Code 1858, § 3831 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 112, § 2); Acts 1867-1868, ch. 11, § 1; integrated in Shan., § 5619; Code 1932, § 9801; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-403.

Law Reviews.

Claims Against the State in Tennessee — The Court of Claims, 4 Vand. L. Rev. 875.

Attorney General Opinions. Travel reimbursement for out-of-state witnesses in misdemeanor cases, OAG 99-057, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 197 (3/9/99).

24-4-104. Maximum number of appearances compensated.

No witness shall prove personal attendance in more than four (4) suits where one (1) of the parties is the same or the question to be tried is the same; provided, that this shall apply only to the term where the witness actually testifies in such suits. At all other terms where such witness does not actually testify, the witness shall be allowed to prove attendance in only two (2) of such suits; provided, that in any event such witness shall claim mileage and ferriage in only one (1) of such suits.

Code 1858, § 3834 (deriv. Acts 1824, ch. 13, § 3); Acts 1903, ch. 100; Shan., § 5622; Code 1932, § 9804; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-404.

Cross-References. Maximum number included in bill of costs, §20-12-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 8.

24-4-105. Settlement of case.

If the suit in which the witness is summoned is settled in vacation, and the party summoning such witness neglects to discharge the witness from further attendance, and the witness, for want of such discharge, should attend at the next term, witness such is entitled to prove one (1) day's attendance.

Code 1858, § 3835 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 29); Shan., § 5623; Code 1932, § 9805; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-405.

24-4-106. Probate of attendance — Immediate payment — Travel advances in criminal cases.

The clerk of the court may take probate of witnesses' attendance at any time between the commencement and the final decision of the cause, either in vacation or in term time. The clerk may at that time pay any witness the fees for which the state is liable under §§ 40-17-201 — 40-17-210, or any witness fees due and may accept an assignment from the witness for all such fees paid. The clerk may take credit in the settlement of the clerk's accounts for all such fees advanced represented by a valid assignment.

In criminal cases, with the approval of the judicial cost accountant and at the request of the district attorney general, the state may advance travel expenses as set out in §§ 24-4-102, 40-17-206 and 40-17-208, to witnesses designated by the district attorney general. The judicial cost accountant shall prescribe the procedures which shall be followed in making travel advances as set forth above.

Code 1858, § 3833 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 164, § 1); Shan., § 5621; Code 1932, § 9803; Acts 1947, ch. 4, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9803; Acts 1973, ch. 229, § 1; 1979, ch. 392, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-406; Acts 2012, ch. 611, § 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 8.

24-4-107. Recovery from successful party.

Whenever a party in a court of record recovers a judgment or decree against another for costs, and it appears from the return of the execution that such costs cannot be made out of the person against whom they have been adjudged, the witnesses summoned by the successful party may have judgment by motion against such party for their costs.

Code 1858, § 3832 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 62, § 2); Shan., § 5620; Code 1932, § 9802; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-407.